Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1532.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "specific plan" in section 107(a) of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code, is amended and the subsection is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 107. Definitions.--(a) The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Sketch plan," a simplified, preliminary drawing that outlines the basic layout of a proposed development project, providing a conceptual overview of the land use, lot configuration and potential street alignments.* * *"Specific plan," a detailed plan for [nonresidential] development of an area covered by a municipal or multimunicipal comprehensive plan[, which, when approved and adopted by the participating municipalities through ordinances and agreements, supersedes all other applicable ordinances] under section 308 or 1106.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 308. Municipal Specific Plans.--(a) A municipality shall have authority to adopt a specific plan for the systematic implementation of any portion of the municipality's own comprehensive plan. A specific plan shall meet the requirements of and have the legal effects specified in section 1106.(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, when a municipality adopts a specific plan implementing the municipality's comprehensive plan, the terms of the plan shall be deemed an amendment to the comprehensive plan to the extent that the terms are inconsistent.20250HB1532PN1904 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Notwithstanding section 1106(e), a municipality may establish a reasonable fee to recover the cost of adopting and implementing a specific plan under subsection (a).Section 3. Section 1106 of the act is amended to read:Section 1106. Specific Plans.--(a) [Participating municipalities] A municipality shall have authority to adopt a specific plan for the systematic implementation of a county or multimunicipal comprehensive plan for any [nonresidential] part of the area covered by the plan under this article or municipal comprehensive plan under Article III. Such specific plan shall include a text and a diagram or diagrams and implementing ordinances which may specify [all of the following in detail]:(1) The distribution, location, intensity, extent of area and standards for land uses and facilities, including design of sewage, water, drainage and other essential facilities needed to support the land uses.(2) The location, classification and design of all transportation facilities, including, but not limited to, streets and roads needed to serve the land uses described in the specific plan.(3) Standards for population density, accommodation of expected new housing, dwelling types, land coverage, building intensity, housing densities for households of various income levels and supporting services, including utilities. HOUSING STANDARDS MAY INCLUDE AVAILABILITY OF AFFORDABLE OR BELOW-MARKET HOUSING.(4) Standards for the preservation, conservation, development and use of natural resources, including the protection of significant open spaces, resource lands and agricultural lands within or adjacent to the area covered by 20250HB1532PN1904 - 3 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the specific plan.(5) A program of implementation including regulations, financing of the capital improvements and provisions for repealing or amending the specific plan. Regulations may include zoning, storm water, subdivision and land development, highway access and any other provisions for which municipalities are authorized by law to enact. The regulations may be amended into the county or municipal ordinances or adopted as separate ordinances. If enacted as separate ordinances for the area covered by the specific plan, the ordinances shall repeal and replace any county or municipal ordinances in effect within the area covered by the specific plan, and ordinances shall conform to the provisions of the specific plan.(b) (1) [No] Except as provided under section 308(b), a specific plan may not be adopted or amended unless the proposed plan or amendment is consistent with an adopted county or multimunicipal comprehensive plan.(2) No capital project by any municipal authority or municipality shall be approved or undertaken and no final plan, development plan or plat for any subdivision or development of land shall be approved unless such projects, plans or plats are consistent with the adopted specific plan.(c) [In adopting or amending a specific plan, a county and participating municipalities shall use] A specific plan shall be adopted or amended using the same procedures as provided in this article or Article III, as applicable, for adopting comprehensive plans and ordinances. Nothing in this section shall prevent the concurrent adoption or amendment of a comprehensive plan and related specific plan.20250HB1532PN1904 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Whenever a specific plan has been adopted, applicants for subdivision or land development approval shall [be required to submit]:(1) Participate in a pre-application conference with the planning agency and present a sketch plan on a proposed development permit application.(2) Submit only a final plan as provided in Article V, provided that such final plan is consistent with and implements the adopted specific plan.(e) A county or counties and participating municipalities are prohibited from assessing subdivision and land development applicants for the cost of the specific plan.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1532PN1904 - 5 - 12345678910111213